West Virginia, session 2025, HB2448.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT. §15-5-31. Religious Freedom Protection Act. (a)  Emergencies - Notwithstanding any other provision in this act to the contrary, no order issued pursuant to the authority granted under §15-5-6, nor any control measure taken under §15-5-1 et seq., may do any of the following:(1) Infringe on the right to assemble to worship according to a person's faith;(2) Impact the ability to travel to or from a place of worship;(3) Authorize any adverse action against a religious institution or members of a religious organization for exercising their religion.(b) Definition - For purposes of this section, the term "adverse action" shall include the application of a civil or criminal penalty or the imposition of an administrative sanction.(c) Cause of action - Any religious institution that suffers any direct or indirect harm as a result of a violation of this section shall have a private cause of action for injunctive relief, damages, and any other relief available under law. (d) Statute of limitations - All civil actions must be initiated within two years after the harm occurred. Persons or organizations who prevail on a claim brought pursuant to this section shall be entitled to monetary damages, including for any psychological, emotional, and physical harm suffered, reasonable attorney's fees and costs, and any other appropriate relief. (e)  Effective date - This act shall take effect immediately upon passage.